Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.06.260

Shares without certificates.

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may approve the issuance of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The approval does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

(2) Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall deliver to the shareholder a written statement containing the information required on certificates by RCW 23B.06.250 (2) and (3), and, if applicable, RCW 23B.06.270.

[ 2020 c 57 s 45; 2009 c 189 s 10; 2002 c 297 s 18; 1989 c 165 s 54.]